Texas, session 891, SB42.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 2308, Occupations Code, is amended by adding Subchapter L to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER L. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS Sec. 2308.551.  CONSENT TOW FEES DURING DECLARED DISASTER. (a) A towing company may not take advantage of a disaster declared by the governor under Chapter 418, Government Code, or by the president of the United States by demanding an exorbitant or excessive price for a consent tow. (b)  A county judge may establish: (1)  the fees that a towing company may charge in connection with a consent tow during a declared disaster described by Subsection (a) in the county; (2)  the maximum amount a towing company may charge for fees, other than tow fees, in connection with a consent tow during a declared disaster described by Subsection (a) in the county; and (3)  a maximum amount that a towing company may charge for the following consent tows during a declared disaster described by Subsection (a) in the county: (A)  standard light-duty tows of motor vehicles with a gross weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less; (B)  medium-duty tows of motor vehicles with a gross weight rating of more than 10,000 pounds but less than 25,000 pounds; and (C)  heavy-duty tows of motor vehicles with a gross weight rating that exceeds 25,000 pounds. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.